Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB62.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Social Media Anti-Censorship Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Acceptable use policy." The acceptable use policy required under section 4(a)."Journalist." A person regularly engaged in collecting, photographing, recording, writing, editing, reporting or publishing news, for gain or livelihood, while working as a salaried employee of, or independent contractor for, a 1234567891011121314151617 newspaper, news journal, news agency, press association, wire service, radio or television station, network or news magazine."Post." To share, display, provide, upload, transmit, publish, distribute, communicate or circulate content on a social media platform."Social media platform" or "platform." A public or semipublic Internet-based service or application that has users in this Commonwealth and that meets all of the following criteria:(1) A substantial function of the platform, service or application is to connect users in order to allow users to interact socially with each other within the service or application, provided that a platform, service or application that provides email or direct messaging services or cloud computing shall not be considered to meet this criterion solely on the basis of that function.(2) The platform, service or application allows users to do the following:(i) Construct a public or semipublic profile for purposes of signing into and using the platform, service or application.(ii) Populate a list of other users with whom an individual shares a social connection within the system.(iii) Create or post content viewable by other users, including on message boards, in chat rooms or through a landing page or main feed that presents the user with content generated by other users.(3) The platform, service or application has more than 50,000,000 active users in the United States in a calendar month.20250HB0062PN0051 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "User." A person who posts content on a social media platform.Section 3. Applicability.This act shall apply to a user who:(1) resides in this Commonwealth;(2) does business in this Commonwealth; or(3) posts or receives content on a platform in this Commonwealth.Section 4. Acceptable use policy.(a) Policy required.--Each platform shall develop and institute an acceptable use policy in accordance with this act.(b) Publication of policy.--A platform shall publish the platform's acceptable use policy in a location that is easily accessible to a user.(c) Requirements of policy.--A platform's acceptable use policy shall, at a minimum:(1) reasonably inform a user about the type of content that the platform deems violative of its acceptable use policy;(2) explain the steps the platform will take to ensure that content complies with the acceptable use policy;(3) explain the means by which a user can notify the platform of content that potentially violates the acceptable use policy, illegal content or illegal activity; and(4) reasonably inform a user about the user's right to appeal the platform's removal of content that allegedly violates the platform's acceptable use policy in accordance with section 6.Section 5. Removal of content.(a) Notification and appeal.--Except as provided under 20250HB0062PN0051 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (b), if a platform removes content based on an alleged violation of the platform's acceptable use policy, the platform shall:(1) immediately notify the user who posted the content of the removal and explain the reason for the removal of the content from the platform; and(2) allow the user to appeal the decision to remove the content from the platform in accordance with section 6.(b) Exception.--A platform is not required to provide a user with notice or an opportunity to appeal under section 6 if the platform knows or reasonably believes that the alleged policy-violating content relates to an ongoing law enforcement investigation.Section 6. Appeal of content removal.(a) Appeal system.--A platform shall provide an easily accessible appeal system to enable a user to submit an appeal regarding the platform's decision to remove alleged policy-violating content posted by the user on the platform.(b) Appeal process.--Upon receiving an appeal regarding the platform's removal of content that the user asserts did not violate the platform's acceptable use policy, the platform shall, no later than 14 days after receiving the appeal:(1) review the content;(2) determine whether the content adheres to the platform's acceptable use policy;(3) take appropriate steps based on the determination under paragraph (2); and(4) notify the user regarding the determination made under paragraph (2) and the steps taken under paragraph (3). Section 7. Biannual public transparency report.20250HB0062PN0051 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Report required.--A platform shall publish a report every six months that includes, with respect to the preceding six-month period, the following information:(1) The total number of instances in which the platform was alerted to alleged illegal content, illegal activity or content that violates the platform's acceptable use policy by:(i) a user complaint;(ii) an employee of or person contracting with the social media platform; or(iii) an internal automated detection tool.(2) Subject to subsection (b), the number of instances in which the platform took any of the following adverse actions after determining that content was illegal, depicted illegal activity or violated the platform's acceptable use policy:(i) Content removal.(ii) Content demonetization.(iii) Content deprioritization.(iv) Negative categorization or disclaimer of the content.(v) Account suspension.(vi) Account removal.(vii) Any other action taken in accordance with the platform's acceptable use policy.(3) The purported country of residence of the user who created or posted the content for each instance described under paragraph (2).(4) The number of instances in which a user appealed the decision to remove the user's content that allegedly violated 20250HB0062PN0051 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the platform's acceptable use policy under section 6.(5) Of the appeals identified under paragraph (4), the percentage of appeals that resulted in the restoration of content.(6) To the platform's knowledge or belief, the number of instances in which an adverse action identified under paragraph (2) was directed at a user who, at the time of posting the content for which the platform took the adverse action, was employed or engaged as a:(i) Federal, state or local politician;(ii) Federal, state or local political candidate;(iii) Federal, state or local public official;(iv) Federal, state or local political organization;(v) public institution as that term is defined in section 102 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code; or(vi) journalist.(b) Categorization of adverse actions.--The information described under subsection (a)(2) shall be categorized by the:(1) rule the user violated; and(2) source for the alert of illegal content, illegal activity or content that violated the platform's acceptable use policy, including:(i) a governmental entity;(ii) a user;(iii) an internal automated detection tool; or(iv) persons employed by or contracting with the platform.(c) Governmental entity.--If the source for the alert of illegal content, illegal activity or alleged policy-violating 20250HB0062PN0051 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 content under subsection (b)(2) was a governmental entity, the platform shall identify the name of the entity with as much specificity as possible.(d) Publication of report.--A platform shall publish the report required under subsection (a) with an open license, in a readable and open format and in a location that is easily accessible to users.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0062PN0051 - 7 - 123456789